Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2193.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 15-142, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-142. Directory information relating to students; notice; opt-out; consent; access to directory information; access to school property; violation; definition A. Except as provided in subsection B of this section, a school may disclose directory information relating to students in accordance with state and federal law if the school first notifies the parent or eligible student of all of the following: 1. The types of information that the school has designated as directory information. 2. The right of the parent or eligible student to refuse the school's designation of any or all of the types of information about the student as directory information. 3. The period of time within which a parent or eligible student must notify the school in writing that the parent or eligible student does not want any or all of the types of information about the student designated as directory information. B. Except as required by state or federal law, a school may not disclose the address, telephone number or email address of a student unless either: 1. The parent or eligible student has affirmatively consented in writing to the disclosure. 2. The parent or eligible student has not opted out of the disclosure pursuant to subsection A of this section and the disclosure is either any of the following: (a) To one or more students who are enrolled in the school and for educational purposes. (b) To one or more parents of one or more students who are enrolled in the school. (c) to a representative of a nonprofit organization that is organized and operated for the purpose of supporting the school, school district or charter school. (b) (d) To school employees and for school business purposes. C. If the governing board of a school district or the governing body of a charter school allows the release of directory information relating to students, subject to subsections A and B of this section, or allows access to school buildings, school grounds or other school property to persons who inform students of educational or occupational opportunities, the governing board or governing body shall provide access to directory information relating to students and to school property on the same basis for official recruiting representatives of the militia of this state and the armed services of the United States for the purpose of informing students of educational and occupational opportunities available in the militia and the armed services.  If the school district or charter school allows the release of directory information relating to students, subject to subsections A and B of this section, the information shall be released on or before October 31 of each year. The department of education shall design and provide to school districts and charter schools a form to allow parents or eligible students to request that a student's directory information not be released pursuant to the elementary and secondary education act as reauthorized by the no child left behind act of 2001.  School districts and charter schools shall distribute the form to parents and eligible students each year separate from any other form.  If a school district or charter school distributes materials to parents and eligible students through an electronic communication or on an internet website, the form may be distributed in the same manner.  A person who is wrongfully denied access to directory information or access to school buildings, school grounds or other school property may notify the department of education, which shall report the alleged violation to the United States department of education. D. Notwithstanding subsection C of this section, student transcripts may not be released to representatives of postsecondary institutions, the militia of this state or the armed services of the United States unless the student consents in writing to the release of the  student's transcript. The governing board of the school district or the governing body of the charter school shall provide the student with a transcript release form that allows the student to designate in separate check boxes whether the transcript is to be released to postsecondary institutions, the militia of this state or the armed services of the United States, or to any combination of these entities. E. This section does not authorize school districts or charter schools to release information that would violate the family educational rights and privacy act of 1974 (20 United States Code section 1232g).  Any person who suspects that a school district or charter school has knowingly violated the family educational rights and privacy act may notify the principal of the charter school or the superintendent of the school district. If the matter is not satisfactorily resolved by the principal of the charter school or the superintendent of the school district within sixty days after the notice, the person may file a complaint with the superintendent of public instruction.  If the superintendent of public instruction determines that a school district or charter school is knowingly in violation of the family educational rights and privacy act, the superintendent of public instruction shall notify the school district or charter school that it is in violation of the family educational rights and privacy act.  If the superintendent of public instruction determines that the school district or charter school has failed to correct the violation within sixty days after a notice has been issued pursuant to this subsection, the superintendent of public instruction may inform the family policy compliance office of the United States department of education of a possible violation of the family educational rights and privacy act. F. For the purposes of this section, "eligible student" means a student who is at least eighteen years of age or is emancipated. END_STATUTE